Florida, session 2026, HB595.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (m) of subsection (1) of section
121.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
121.055 Senior Management Service Class.—There is hereby
established a separate class of membership within the Florida
Retirement System to be known as the "Senior Management Service
Class," which shall become effective February 1, 1987.
(1)
(m)1. Effective July 1, 2020, participation in the Senior
Management Service Class is compulsory for each appointed
criminal conflict and civil regional counsel and each district's
assistant regional counsel chiefs, administrative directors, and
chief investigators.
2. Effective July 1, 2026, participation in the Senior
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb595-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 595 2026
Management Service Class is compulsory for each region's
assistant regional counsel supervisors; employee class code
9903.
3. A Senior Management Service Class member under this
paragraph may purchase additional retirement credit in the class
for creditable service within the purview of the Senior
Management Service Class retroactive to October 1, 2007, and may
upgrade retirement credit for such service in accordance with
paragraph (j). However, this service credit may not be purchased
by the employer on behalf of the member.
Section 2. For the 2026-2027 fiscal year, the sum of
$1,226,804 in recurring funds is appropriated from the General
Revenue Fund to the offices of the criminal conflict and civil
regional counsel for the purpose of paying retirement benefits
for specified positions within those offices.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb595-00